src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
# Adjective inflection

This file documents `affixes/adjectives.lexc`, the file for Livonian adjective inflection.

## Indeclneables

**LEXICON A_-ZERO =  modifiers that do not decline, goes to #

**LEXICON A_ = gives Pos tag.

## Stem lexica

LEXICON A_PŪ  contains pū: 12

LEXICON A_BRĪ  contains brī:brī 16

LEXICON A_KALĀ   contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18

LEXICON A_TUBĀ  tubā:tuʼbā 19

LEXICON A_AMĀ  amā:aʼm 19a

LEXICON A_AIGĀ  aigā:aʼig 20

LEXICON A_KŪJA  kūja:??lēba 21

LEXICON A_IZĀ  izā:izā 25

LEXICON A_OKSĀ  oksā:oksā 30

LEXICON A_ĀIGA  āiga:āiga 33

LEXICON A_SĪLMA  sīlma:sīlma 34

LEXICON A_PADĀ  padā:padā 39

LEXICON A_KÄPĀ  käpā:käpā 41

LEXICON A_MAKSĀ  maksā:maksā 42

LEXICON A_KĒRA  kēra:kēra 43

LEXICON A_JǬRA  jǭra:jǭra 44

LEXICON A_ĀITA  āita:āita 46

LEXICON A_ŪŠKA  ūška:ūška 47

LEXICON A_MȬKA  mȭka:mȭka 48

LEXICON A_DADŽĀ  dadžā:dadžā 49

LEXICON A_TĪERA  tīera:tīera 54

LEXICON A_LILLA  kuțā:kuțā 57

LEXICON A_KIʼV  kiʼv:kiv 59

LEXICON A_PIʼŅ  piʼņ:piņ 64

LEXICON A_OKŠ  : 68

LEXICON A_KAŠ  : 69

LEXICON A_TORĪ  torī: 71

LEXICON A_KÕʼL  kõʼl:kõl 73

LEXICON A_NIʼM  niʼm:nim 76

LEXICON A_KAND  kand: 94

* **LEXICON A_SERK** : 94
serk:serk

LEXICON A_UL  ul: 99

LEXICON A_NIŖȚ  niŗț: 102

LEXICON A_DAŅTŠ  daņtš: 105

LEXICON A_TÄUŽ  täuž: adres 112

LEXICON A_SIELDÕ  sieldõ: 118

LEXICON A_NǬʼGÕ  nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119

LEXICON A_AŠŠÕ  : 120

LEXICON A_DRŪʼOŠÕ  drūʼošõ:drūošõ 121

LEXICON A_IRM  : 125

LEXICON A_KIM  : 126

LEXICON A_VAʼIT  vaʼit:vait 128

LEXICON A_AMĀT  : 129

LEXICON A_SAʼGDIT  saʼgdit:sagdit 131

LEXICON A_VIĻȚ  : 132

LEXICON A_EĻ  eļ: 133

LEXICON A_BLĒʼḐ  blēʼḑ:blēḑ 134

LEXICON A_FAKT  : 135

LEXICON A_SĪEND  sīend: 138

LEXICON A_LǞʼND  lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139

LEXICON A_ĀIGAST  āigast: 140

LEXICON A_ANALĪZ  analīz: 141

LEXICON A_NĪʼEM  nīʼem:nīem 142

LEXICON A_VIŠ  : 144

LEXICON A_SIDĀM  : 157

LEXICON A_TŪOITÕG  : 158

LEXICON A_KǬRAND  kǭrand: 159
* Yaml: **armtõb**

LEXICON A_ȬʼDÕG  ȭʼdõg:ȭdõg 160

LEXICON A_TAPTÕD  taptõd: 161

LEXICON A_TĪʼEDÕD  tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162

LEXICON A_VĪDÕZ  vīdõz: 163

LEXICON A_TUOISTÕNZ  : 164

LEXICON A_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ  ī'dõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165

LEXICON A_KÄBRĀZ  : 168

LEXICON A_MAIGĀZ  : 169

LEXICON A_NÕTKĀZ  : 170

LEXICON A_RIKĀZ  : 171

LEXICON A_ĀMBAZ  āmbaz:āmba 173

LEXICON A_PŪŖAZ  : 174

LEXICON A_PǬĻAZ  : 175

LEXICON A_MÕTKÕZ  mõtkõz: 179

LEXICON A_VȬRÕZ  vȭrõz: 180

LEXICON A_ARĀGÕZ  : 181

LEXICON A_ÄʼGGÕZ  ä'ggõz:äggõz 182

LEXICON A_PŪʼDÕZ  pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183

LEXICON A_SĒJI  : 186 āndaji:āndaji sēji:sēji

LEXICON A_AKKIJI  akkiji:akkiji 187

LEXICON A_LĒʼJI  lēʼji:lēʼji 188

LEXICON A_NAI  nai: 191

LEXICON A_AʼIGI  aʼigi:aigi 192

LEXICON A_PUʼNNI  pu'nni:punni 193

LEXICON A_KAȚKI  : 194

LEXICON A_KUKKI  : 195

LEXICON A_AIGI  aigi:aigi 196

LEXICON A_OUKI  : 197

LEXICON A_PAŖĪ  : 198

LEXICON A_TŪĻI  : 199

LEXICON A_AʼBLI  aʼbli:abli 200

LEXICON A_SĒMI  : 201

LEXICON A_LĒʼMI  lē'mi:lēʼmi 202

LEXICON A_ALĪZ  : 203

LEXICON A_KĒRATÕKS  : 207

LEXICON A_VARĪKŠ  varīkš: 209

LEXICON A_ŪŽ  : 219 ūž:ūd

LEXICON A_JŪŖ  jūŗ:jūr 221

LEXICON A_SŪR  sūr:sūr 222

LEXICON A_DULLÕNZ  dullõnz:dullõn 227

LEXICON A_AŅGÕRZ  : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229

LEXICON A_TIDĀR  tidār:tidār 233

LEXICON A_APPÕN  appõn:appõn 235

LEXICON A_ǬʼRÕN  ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236

LEXICON A_KĪNDÕR  kīndõr:kīndõr 237

LEXICON A_BÄʼZMÕR  bäʼzmõr:bäzmõr 238

LEXICON A_TARĪĻ  tarīļ:tarīļ 239

LEXICON A_ĀNKAŖ  ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240

LEXICON A_ǬʼBIĻ  ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-liv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>
